Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH

SUBTITLE A. HOSPITAL DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 1113. WILBARGER COUNTY HOSPITAL DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1113.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Wilbarger County Hospital District.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.002. AUTHORITY FOR OPERATION. The Wilbarger County Hospital District operates in accordance with Section 9, Article IX, Texas Constitution, and has the powers and responsibilities provided by that section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.003. POLITICAL SUBDIVISION. The district is a political subdivision of this state.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The boundaries of the district are coextensive with the boundaries of Wilbarger County.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.005. CORRECTION OF INVALID PROCEDURES. If a court holds that any procedure under this chapter violates the constitution of this state or of the United States, the district by resolution may provide an alternative procedure that conforms with the constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. DISTRICT ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 1113.051. BOARD ELECTION; TERM. (a) The board consists of seven directors elected from the district at large by position. To be elected, a candidate must receive a majority of the votes cast in the election for that position.

(b) Directors serve staggered three-year terms.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.052. NOTICE OF ELECTION AND RUNOFF ELECTION. (a) At least 10 days before the date of a directors' election, notice of the election must be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation in Wilbarger County.

(b) At least seven days before the date of a runoff election of directors, notice of the runoff election must be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation in Wilbarger County.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.053. BALLOT PETITION. A person who wants to have the person's name printed on the ballot as a candidate for director must file with the board secretary a petition requesting that action. The petition must be filed by the deadline imposed by Section 144.005, Election Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 142 (H.B. 2888), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1113.054. QUALIFICATIONS FOR OFFICE. A person may not be appointed or elected as a director unless the person is:

(1) a resident of the district; and

(2) at least 18 years of age at the time of the appointment or election.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.055. BOND; RECORD OF BOND AND OATH. (a) Each director shall execute a good and sufficient bond for $1,000 that is:

(1) payable to the district; and

(2) conditioned on the faithful performance of the director's duties.

(b) Each director's bond and constitutional oath of office shall be deposited with the district's depository bank for safekeeping.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.056. BOARD VACANCY. (a) If a vacancy occurs in the office of director, the remaining directors shall appoint a director for the unexpired term.

(b) If the number of directors is reduced to fewer than four for any reason, the remaining directors shall immediately call a special election to fill the vacancies. If the remaining directors do not call the election, a district court, on application of a district voter or taxpayer, may order the directors to hold the election.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.057. OFFICERS. The board shall elect from among its members a presiding officer, assistant presiding officer, and a secretary.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.058. COMPENSATION; EXPENSES. A director serves without compensation but may be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of official duties on approval of the expenses by the board.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.059. VOTING REQUIREMENT. A concurrence of four directors is sufficient in any matter relating to district business.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.060. MEETINGS. (a) A board meeting may be called by the presiding officer or any four directors.

(b) Notice of the time and place of a board meeting must be given to each director not later than the seventh day before the time of the meeting.

(c) This section does not prevent the board from establishing by resolution a regular time and place for meetings for which special notice is not required.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.061. EMPLOYEES. (a) The board may employ a general manager and other necessary professional and clerical personnel.

(b) The title of the general manager hired by the board may be president.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.062. MAINTENANCE OF RECORDS; PUBLIC INSPECTION. Except as provided by Section 1113.055, all district records, including books, accounts, notices, and minutes, and all other matters of the district and the operation of its facilities, shall be:

(1) maintained at the district office; and

(2) open to public inspection at the district office at all reasonable hours.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.063. SEAL. The board may adopt a seal for the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 1113.101. DISTRICT RESPONSIBILITY. The district has full responsibility for providing medical and hospital care for the district's needy and indigent residents.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.102. RESTRICTION ON COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL TAXATION. Wilbarger County or a municipality in Wilbarger County may not impose a tax for hospital purposes.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.103. MANAGEMENT AND CONTROL OF DISTRICT. The management and control of the district is vested in the board.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.104. RULES. (a) The board may adopt rules governing the operation of the district and district facilities.

(b) The rules, on approval by the board, may be published in booklet form at district expense and may be made available to any taxpayer on request.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.105. PURCHASING AND ACCOUNTING. (a) The board may prescribe the method and manner of making purchases and expenditures by and for the district.

(b) The board shall prescribe:

(1) all accounting and control procedures; and

(2) the method of purchasing necessary supplies, materials, and equipment.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.106. DISTRICT PROPERTY. (a) The board may sell or lease property owned by the district at public auction or at private sale, on terms the board may determine.

(b) The sale or lease of property and the terms of the sale or lease must be approved by a vote of at least three-fourths of the total number of directors. The vote must be recorded by resolution in the district's minutes.

(c) After the adoption of a resolution authorizing a sale or lease, the board shall hold a public hearing on the proposed sale or lease. Notice of the public hearing and the subject of the hearing must be published in the English language in a newspaper of general circulation in the district once a week for three consecutive weeks preceding the hearing. The last of the notices must be published not less than five days before the date set for the hearing.

(d) Not more than 10 days after the date of the public hearing, the board shall again vote on the proposed sale or lease as stated in the initial resolution. The sale or lease must be approved by a vote of at least three-fourths of the total number of directors. The vote must be recorded in the district's minutes.

(e) Any transfer, lease, or sale of district property must be by an instrument signed by the board presiding officer and attested by the board secretary.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.107. EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) The district may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire a fee simple or other interest in any type of property located in district territory, if the interest is necessary or convenient to exercise a right, power, privilege, or function conferred on the district by this chapter.

(b) The district must exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by Chapter 21, Property Code, except the district is not required to deposit in the trial court money or a bond as otherwise required by Section 21.021(a), Property Code.

(c) In a condemnation proceeding brought by the district, the district is not required to:

(1) pay in advance or provide a bond or other security for costs in the trial court;

(2) provide a bond for the issuance of a temporary restraining order or a temporary injunction; or

(3) provide a bond for costs or a supersedeas bond on an appeal or petition for review.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.108. GIFTS AND ENDOWMENTS. The board may accept for the district a gift or endowment to be held in trust and administered by the board for the purposes and under the directions, limitations, or other provisions prescribed in writing by the donor that are not inconsistent with the proper management and objectives of the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.109. PAYMENT FOR TREATMENT; PROCEDURES. (a) When a patient who claims to be indigent is admitted to a district facility, the board shall have an inquiry made into the circumstances of:

(1) the patient; and

(2) the patient's relatives legally liable for the patient's support.

(b) If an agent designated by the district to handle the inquiry determines that the patient or those relatives cannot pay for all or part of the patient's care and treatment in the hospital, the amount that cannot be paid becomes a charge against the district.

(c) If it is determined that the patient or those relatives are liable to pay for all or part of the patient's care and treatment, the patient or those relatives shall be ordered to pay to the district's treasurer a specified amount each week for the patient's support. The amount ordered must be proportionate to their financial ability and may not exceed the actual per capita cost of maintenance.

(d) The district may collect the amount from the patient's estate, or from those relatives legally liable for the patient's support, in the manner provided by law for the collection of expenses of the last illness of a deceased person.

(e) If there is a dispute as to the ability to pay or doubt in the mind of the district's designated agent, the board shall hold a hearing and, after calling witnesses, shall:

(1) resolve the dispute or doubt; and

(2) issue any appropriate order.

(f) The order may be appealed to the district court.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.110. AUTHORITY TO SUE AND BE SUED. As a governmental agency, the district may sue and be sued in its own name in any court in this state.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1113.151. BUDGET. The board annually shall have a budget prepared for the next fiscal year that includes:

(1) proposed expenditures and disbursements;

(2) estimated receipts and collections; and

(3) the amount of taxes required to be imposed for the year.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.152. PROPOSED BUDGET: NOTICE AND HEARING. (a) The board shall hold a public hearing on the proposed budget.

(b) Notice of the hearing must be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in Wilbarger County not later than the 10th day before the date of the hearing.

(c) Any district taxpayer is entitled to:

(1) appear at the time and place designated in the notice; and

(2) be heard regarding any item included in the proposed budget.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.153. FISCAL YEAR. The district's fiscal year begins on October 1 and ends on September 30.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.154. ANNUAL AUDIT. (a) The board annually shall have an independent audit made of the district's books and records for the preceding fiscal year.

(b) Not later than December 31 each year, the audit shall be filed:

(1) with the comptroller; and

(2) at the district's office.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.155. DEPOSITORY OR TREASURER. (a) The board by resolution shall designate a bank or banks in Wilbarger County as the district's depository or treasurer. A designated bank serves for two years and until a successor is designated.

(b) All income received by the district shall be deposited with the district depository.

(c) All district money shall be secured in the manner provided for securing county funds.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER E. BONDS

Sec. 1113.201. GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. The board may issue and sell general obligation bonds in the name and on the faith and credit of the district for any purpose relating to the purchase, construction, acquisition, repair, or renovation of buildings and improvements and equipping buildings and improvements for hospital purposes.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.202. TAX TO PAY GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. (a) The board shall impose an ad valorem tax at a rate sufficient to create an interest and sinking fund to pay the principal of and interest on general obligation bonds issued by the district under Section 1113.201 as the bonds mature.

(b) The tax required by this section together with any maintenance and operation tax the district imposes may not in any year exceed:

(1) 50 cents on each $100 valuation of all taxable property in the district; or

(2) the maximum amount approved by the voters under Section 1113.253.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.203. GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND ELECTION. (a) The district may issue general obligation bonds only if the bonds are authorized by a majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

(b) The board may order a bond election on its own motion.

(c) The order must specify:

(1) the location of the polling places;

(2) the presiding election officers;

(3) the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued;

(4) the amount of the bonds to be authorized;

(5) the maximum interest rate of the bonds; and

(6) the maximum maturity date of the bonds.

(d) Notice of a bond election shall be given by publishing a substantial copy of the order in a newspaper of general circulation in Wilbarger County once each week for two consecutive weeks before the date of the election. The first publication must occur at least 14 days before the date of the election.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.204. MATURITY OF GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. District general obligation bonds must mature not later than 40 years after the date of issuance.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.205. EXECUTION OF GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. The board presiding officer shall execute the general obligation bonds in the district's name, and the board secretary shall countersign the bonds.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.206. REFUNDING BONDS. (a) District refunding bonds may be issued without an election and in the manner provided by this subchapter to refund outstanding bonds issued by the district.

(b) A refunding bond may be:

(1) sold, with the proceeds of the refunding bond applied to the payment of the outstanding bonds; or

(2) exchanged wholly or partly for not less than a similar amount of the outstanding bonds and the unpaid matured interest on those bonds.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER F. TAXES

Sec. 1113.251. IMPOSITION OF AD VALOREM TAX. (a) On final approval of the budget, the board shall impose a tax on all taxable property in the district subject to district taxation.

(b) The board shall impose the tax to:

(1) pay the interest on and create a sinking fund for bonds issued by the district for hospital purposes as provided by this chapter;

(2) provide for the maintenance and operations of the hospital or hospital system;

(3) make improvements and additions to the hospital system; and

(4) acquire necessary sites for the hospital system by purchase, lease, or condemnation.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.252. TAX RATE. Unless the rate is increased as provided by Section 1113.253, the board may impose the tax at a rate not to exceed 50 cents on each $100 valuation of all taxable property in the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.253. ELECTION TO INCREASE MAXIMUM TAX RATE. The board may call an election to increase the district's maximum tax rate to a rate not to exceed 75 cents on each $100 valuation of all taxable property in the district if the board determines that an increase is necessary to carry out the purposes for which the initial tax rate was authorized.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 1113.254. TAX ASSESSOR-COLLECTOR. The tax assessor-collector of Wilbarger County shall assess and collect taxes imposed by the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2015.